Hawaii statutes.
§456-12 Protest, evidence of what. The
protest of any foreign or inland bill of exchange, or promissory note or order,
duly certified by any notary public, under the notary's hand and official seal,
shall be legal evidence of the facts stated in the protest, as to the same, and
also as to the notice given to the drawer or indorser in any court of law. [CC
1859, §1271; RL 1925, §3179; RL 1935, §5205; RL 1945, §7672; RL 1955, §168-12;
HRS §456-12; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next